src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-nouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1+meZ !!= * @CODE@ 
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCiar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerniar   flex-iv ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+TAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCerniartar    flex-iv ;
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>%TRUNClerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCleri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNClisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNClersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNClersuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCliuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCnngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+SAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCnngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCqar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu IV_voq ;
+USAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCusaar IV_r_stem ;
+N+Abs+Sg: Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCmit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>g2a Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCa Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmini Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+TTAAQ:%>%VCTRUNCminissaaq # ;
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmikka K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCi K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmini K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>put Krestr ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>si Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCat Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>tik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmivut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCmigut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmisi K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC K_plur ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCmit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmip Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmima Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmivit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCata Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimi Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmima K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>ma K_plur ;
+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmivit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCisa K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimi K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitta Krestr ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissi Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCata Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitta K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissi K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCisa K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCminut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>nut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminnut TrmVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCminit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>nit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminnit AblVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimiit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCminiit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCaniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminiit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCiniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminiit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>niit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmiminngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCmininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCaninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimininngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>ninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimi LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCmini LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCani LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimini LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCini LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimini LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>ni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminni LokVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmitut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCmitut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmittut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmittut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCatut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimisut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmittut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmittut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCitut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimisut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsitut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissitut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCattut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimittut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsitut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissitut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>tut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimittut AeqVb ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCminik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCminnik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinnik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinnik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminnik Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsinnik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissinnik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>nik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Ins+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmiminnik K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmikkut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+INNAQ:%>%VCTRUNCmikkuinnaq Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCmitigut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmikkut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmikkut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCagut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCatigut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimigut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmikkut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmikkut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCisigut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimigut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsigut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissigut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCatigut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimikkut Krestr ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmitsigut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmissigut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
+N+Via+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCisigut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ 
+N+Via+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%VCTRUNCmimikkut K_plur ; !Z1+meZ
